Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-515.01
Theft of telecommunications service; penalty.

(1) It is unlawful for any person to:

(a) Knowingly make or possess any device designed to or commonly used to obtain telecommunications service fraudulently from a licensed cable television franchisee with the intent to use such device in the commission of an offense described in subsection (1) of section 28-515;

(b) Knowingly tamper with, interfere with, or connect to any cables, wires, converters, or other devices used for the distribution of telecommunications service by any mechanical, electrical, acoustical, or other means without authority from the operator of the service with the intent of obtaining telecommunications service fraudulently; or

(c) Sell, give, transfer, or offer or advertise for sale a device which such person knows or should know is intended to be used for the purpose of obtaining telecommunications service fraudulently.

(2) For purposes of this section:

(a) Telecommunications service includes, but is not limited to, telephone service and cable television service; and

(b) Device includes, but is not limited to, instrument, apparatus, equipment, and plans or instructions for making or assembling the instrument, apparatus, or equipment.

(3) A violation of this section is a Class II misdemeanor.

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 430.